District of Columbia statutes.
29-404.14

Creditor’s action against member.

(a)

A proceeding shall not be brought by a creditor of a membership corporation to reach the liability, if any, of a member to the corporation unless final judgment has been rendered in favor of the creditor against the corporation and execution has been returned unsatisfied in whole or in part or unless the proceeding would be useless. In this case, a member remains immune from liability for debts, obligations, and other liabilities of the corporation under § 29-404.12 and shall be liable only to the extent that the member’s failure to pay amounts owed to the corporation has resulted in damages to the creditor.

(b)

All creditors of a membership corporation, with or without reducing their claims to judgment, may intervene in any creditor’s proceeding brought under subsection (a) of this section to reach and apply unpaid amounts due the corporation.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720